District of Columbia statutes.
3-1312

Lottery and Charitable Games Fund.

(a)

A District of Columbia Lottery and Charitable Games Fund (hereinafter referred to as the “Fund” ) shall be established and controlled by the Board to receive all funds and fees generated by the specific forms of gambling operated or licensed by the Board. All funds generated by gambling activities operated or licensed by the Board shall be deposited in the Fund or a division thereof as created by the Board.

(b)

Any monies of the Board, from whatever source derived (including gifts to the Board), shall be for the sole use of the Fund and shall be deposited as soon as practicable in that Fund and shall be disbursed from the Fund according to the terms of this chapter. Said disbursements from the Fund in amounts up to $500 shall be paid out in checks signed by the Executive Director or his designee. Disbursements in excess of $500 shall be paid out in checks signed by the Executive Director and a member of the Board authorized and designated by the Board. All deposits of such monies shall be secured in a manner consistent with deposits made by the government of the District of Columbia with respect to the deposit of revenue.

(c)

From the Fund, the Board shall first pay for the operation, administration, and capital expenses of the specific forms of gambling operated and licensed by the Board as authorized by this chapter, including the payment of prizes to winners of the games, as specified in this chapter pursuant to regulations promulgated by the Board. The remainder shall be paid over by the Board, on a monthly basis promptly after the 1st of the month for the preceding month, into the General Fund of the District of Columbia as general purpose revenue funds of the District of Columbia.

Mar. 10, 1981, D.C. Law 3-172, § 4, 27 DCR 4736
This section is referenced in § 3-1313 and § 3-1314.
1981 Ed., § 2-2512.